src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
! ----------
!! Adjectives in the Somali language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
Attr ;
State ;
IrregularAdjective ;

LEXICON IrregularAdjective
dhan+A+Pl:dhammu Clitics "much, many" ; ! TODO: Nom? 
xaq+A+Abs:xaqa Clitics "just" ;
xaq+A:xaq Clitics "just" ;
xun+A:xun Clitics "evil" ;
been+A:been Clitics "false" ;
dheer+A:dheer Clitics "tall" ;
badan+A+Attr:bad%^an StatePerson ;
og+A:og StatePerson "know(ing)";
og+A:og Clitics "know(ing)";
eg:ek AdjState ;
eg+A:eg Clitics ;

! TODO: perhaps need to do something else with this.
leh+A+Neg:la'aan Clitics ;
leh+A:leh Clitics ;
leh+A+Nom:lahu Clitics ;

alla+A+Attr:alla Clitics ;
dambe+A+Attr:dambe Clitics ;
dhexaad+A+Attr:dhexaad Clitics ;
dhexe+A+Attr:dhexe Clitics ;
gadaale+A+Attr:gadaale Clitics ;
hoose+A+Attr:hoose Clitics ;
kale+A+Attr:kale Clitics ;
kasta+A+Attr:kasta Clitics ;
keliya+A+Attr:keliya Clitics ;
kore+A+Attr:kore Clitics ;
qalaad+A+Attr:qalaad Clitics ;
sare+A+Attr:sare Clitics ;
shishay+A+Attr:shishay Clitics ;
shishe+A+Attr:shishe Clitics ;
soke+A+Attr:soke Clitics ;
wal+A+Attr:wal Clitics ;
xagge+A+Attr:xagge Clitics ;

kasta+A+Clit/oo+CS:kastoo Clitics ;

LEXICON Attr
badan AdjBase ;
basali AdjBase ;
bisayl AdjBase ;
bisil AdjBase ;
caato AdjBase ;
cagaar AdjBase ;
ceyruun AdjBase ;
dambe AdjBase ;
dhallo AdjBase ;
dhan AdjBase ;
dhuguc AdjBase ;
dufanbadan AdjBase ;
duug AdjBase ;
fareesh AdjBase ;
guduud AdjBase ;
hore AdjBase ;
iswata AdjBase ;
jaale AdjBase ;
kale AdjBase ;
kasta AdjBase ;
keliya AdjBase ;
khaliif AdjBase ;
khatar AdjBase ;
kore AdjBase ;
leh AdjBase ;
mamnuuc AdjBase ;
maroon AdjBase ;
miskiin AdjBase ;
mooyee AdjBase ;
nacas AdjBase ;
nadiif AdjBase ;
nijaas AdjBase ;
qaali AdjBase ;
raqiis AdjBase ;
sare AdjBase ;
sarsare AdjBase ;
shishe AdjBase ;
soke AdjBase ;
sun AdjBase ;
walba AdjBase ;
